Hawaii statutes.
§261-26 Ellison Onizuka Kona
International Airport at Keahole. [Section effective January 1, 2017.
For section effective until December 31, 2016, see below.] The official
name of the airport situated at Keahole in Kona, Hawaii shall be the Ellison
Onizuka Kona International Airport at Keahole. [L 1993, c 53, §1; am L 1997, c
122, §1; am L 2016, c 256, §1]

§261-26 Kona International Airport
at Keahole. [Section effective until December 31, 2016. For section
effective January 1, 2017, see above.] The official name of the airport
situated at Keahole-Kona, Hawaii shall be the Kona International Airport at
Keahole. [L 1993, c 53, §1; am L 1997, c 122, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next